Nevada, session 83, AB553.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 232.3532 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
232.3532 1. The Department shall develop a written plan to
address behavioral health needs in an emergency or disaster. Such a
plan must, without limitation:
(a) Prescribe a process for assessing the need for behavioral
health resources during or after an emergency or disaster based on
the estimated impact of the emergency or disaster and the estimated
depletion of resources during the emergency or disaster;
(b) Ensure continuity of services for existing patients with a
mental illness, developmental disability or intellectual disability
during an emergency or disaster;
(c) Prescribe strategies to deploy triage and psychological first-
aid services during an emergency or disaster;
(d) Identify opportunities for the rendering of mutual aid during
an emergency or disaster;
(e) Prescribe procedures to address the behavioral health needs
of first responders during and after an emergency or disaster; and
(f) Prescribe measures to aid the recovery of the behavioral
health system after an emergency or disaster.
2. On or before December 31 of each year, the Department
shall:
(a) Review the plan developed pursuant to subsection 1 and
revise the plan as necessary; and
(b) Transmit the plan to the Chief of the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the [Military.]
Governor.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Disaster” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 414.0335.
(b) “Emergency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 414.0345.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 233F.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233F.170 In the event of any emergency, the Governor may
direct the [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of] within
the Office of the [Military] Governor to assume control over all or
part of the state communications system.
Sec. 3. Chapter 239C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Office” means the Office of Emergency Management within
the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 4. NRS 239C.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 239C.030 to
239C.110, inclusive, and section 3 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. NRS 239C.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.120 1. The Nevada Commission on Homeland Security
is hereby created.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Commission 16 voting
members that the Governor determines to be appropriate and who
serve at the Governor’s pleasure, which must include at least:
(a) The sheriff of each county whose population is 100,000 or
more.
(b) The chief of the county fire department in each county
whose population is 100,000 or more.
(c) A member of the medical community in a county whose
population is 700,000 or more.
(d) An employee of the largest incorporated city in each county
whose population is 700,000 or more.
(e) A representative recommended by the Inter-Tribal Council
of Nevada, Inc., or its successor organization, to represent tribal
governments in Nevada.
(f) The Director of the Department of Public Safety or his or her
designee.
3. The Governor shall appoint the President and CEO, or his or
her designee, of the Nevada Broadcasters Association, or its
successor organization, to serve as an ex officio voting member of
the Commission.
4. The Governor shall appoint:
(a) An officer of the United States Department of Homeland
Security whom the Department of Homeland Security has
designated for this State;
(b) The agent in charge of the office of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation in this State;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(c) The Chief of the [Division;] Office; and
(d) The Administrator of the Nevada Office of Cyber Defense
Coordination appointed pursuant to NRS 480.920,
 as nonvoting members of the Commission.
5. The Senate Majority Leader shall appoint one member of the
Senate as a nonvoting member of the Commission.
6. The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one member of
the Assembly as a nonvoting member of the Commission.
7. The term of office of each member of the Commission who
is a Legislator is 2 years.
8. The Governor or his or her designee shall:
(a) Serve as Chair of the Commission; and
(b) Appoint a member of the Commission to serve as Vice Chair
of the Commission.
Sec. 6. NRS 239C.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.160 The Commission shall, within the limits of available
money:
1. Make recommendations to the Governor, the Legislature,
agencies of this State, political subdivisions, tribal governments,
businesses located within this State and private persons who reside
in this State with respect to actions and measures that may be taken
to protect residents of this State and visitors to this State from
potential acts of terrorism and related emergencies.
2. Upon consideration of the most recent statewide strategic
plan prepared by the Nevada Office of Cyber Defense Coordination
pursuant to NRS 480.930, make recommendations to the Governor,
through the [Division,] Office, on the use of money received by the
State from any homeland security grant or related program,
including, without limitation, the State Homeland Security Grant
Program and Urban Area Security Initiative, in accordance with the
following:
(a) The [Division] Office shall provide the Commission with
program guidance and briefings;
(b) The Commission must be provided briefings on existing and
proposed projects, and shall consider statewide readiness
capabilities and priorities for the use of money, administered by the
[Division,] Office, from any homeland security grant or related
program;
(c) The Commission shall serve as the public body which
reviews and makes recommendations for the State’s applications to
the Federal Government for homeland security grants or related
programs, as administered by the [Division;] Office; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(d) The Commission shall serve as the public body which
recommends, subject to approval by the Governor, the distribution
of money from any homeland security grant or related program for
use by state, local and tribal government agencies and private sector
organizations.
3. Propose goals and programs that may be set and carried out,
respectively, to counteract or prevent potential acts of terrorism and
related emergencies before such acts of terrorism and related
emergencies can harm or otherwise threaten residents of this State
and visitors to this State.
4. With respect to buildings, facilities, geographic features and
infrastructure that must be protected from acts of terrorism and
related emergencies to ensure the safety of the residents of this State
and visitors to this State, including, without limitation, airports other
than international airports, the Capitol Complex, dams, gaming
establishments, governmental buildings, highways, hotels,
information technology infrastructure, lakes, places of worship,
power lines, public buildings, public utilities, reservoirs, rivers and
their tributaries, and water facilities:
(a) Identify and categorize such buildings, facilities, geographic
features and infrastructure according to their susceptibility to and
need for protection from acts of terrorism and related emergencies;
and
(b) Study and assess the security of such buildings, facilities,
geographic features and infrastructure from acts of terrorism and
related emergencies.
5. Examine the use, deployment and coordination of response
agencies within this State to ensure that those agencies are
adequately prepared to protect residents of this State and visitors to
this State from acts of terrorism and related emergencies.
6. Assess, examine and review the use of information systems
and systems of communication used by response agencies within
this State to determine the degree to which such systems are
compatible and interoperable. After conducting the assessment,
examination and review, the Commission shall:
(a) Establish a state plan setting forth criteria and standards for
the compatibility and interoperability of those systems when used by
response agencies within this State; and
(b) Advise and make recommendations to the Governor relative
to the compatibility and interoperability of those systems when used
by response agencies within this State, with particular emphasis
upon the compatibility and interoperability of public safety radio
systems.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
7. Assess, examine and review the operation and efficacy of
telephone systems and related systems used to provide emergency
911 service.
8. To the extent practicable, cooperate and coordinate with the
[Division] Office to avoid duplication of effort in developing
policies and programs for preventing and responding to acts of
terrorism and related emergencies.
9. Submit an annual briefing to the Governor assessing the
preparedness of the State to counteract, prevent and respond to
potential acts of terrorism and related emergencies, including, but
not limited to, an assessment of response plans and vulnerability
assessments of utilities, public entities and private business in this
State. The briefing must be based on information and documents
reasonably available to the Commission and must be compiled with
the advice of the [Division] Office after all utilities, public entities
and private businesses assessed have a reasonable opportunity to
review and comment on the Commission’s findings.
10. Perform any other acts related to their duties set forth in
subsections 1 to 9, inclusive, that the Commission determines are
necessary to protect or enhance:
(a) The safety and security of the State of Nevada;
(b) The safety of residents of the State of Nevada; and
(c) The safety of visitors to the State of Nevada.
Sec. 7. NRS 239C.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.175 1. The [Adjutant General] Chief of the Office [of
the Military] may employ such persons in the classified service of
the State as the [Adjutant General] Chief determines to be necessary
to carry out the duties of the Commission, including, without
limitation, an Executive Assistant to the Commission, a Policy
Analyst to the Commission, a Grant Analyst to the Commission and
a Specialist in Public Information to the Commission.
2. If the [Adjutant General] Chief of the Office [of the
Military] employs persons pursuant to subsection 1, the salaries for
those positions must be paid from the State General Fund or from
money received as grants from the Federal Government to the extent
allowable pursuant to federal law, or both.
Sec. 8. NRS 239C.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.250 1. Each political subdivision shall adopt and
maintain a response plan. Each new or revised plan must be filed
within 10 days after adoption or revision with:
(a) The [Division;] Office; and
(b) Each response agency that provides services to the political
subdivision.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
2. The response plan required by subsection 1 and any revised
response plan pursuant to subsection 3 must include:
(a) A drawing or map of the layout and boundaries of the
political subdivision;
(b) A drawing or description of the streets and highways within,
and leading into and out of, the political subdivision, including any
approved routes for evacuation;
(c) The location and inventory of emergency response
equipment and resources within the political subdivision;
(d) The location of any unusually hazardous substances within
the political subdivision;
(e) A telephone number that may be used by residents of the
political subdivision to receive information and to make reports with
respect to an act of terrorism or related emergency;
(f) The location of one or more emergency response command
posts that are located within the political subdivision;
(g) A depiction of the location of each police station, sheriff’s
office and fire station that is located within the political subdivision;
(h) Plans for the continuity of the operations and services of the
political subdivision, which plans must be consistent with the
provisions of NRS 239C.260; and
(i) Any other information that the Commission may determine
to be relevant.
3. Each political subdivision shall review its response plan at
least once each year and, as soon as practicable after the review is
completed but not later than December 31 of each year, file with the
[Division] Office and each response agency that provides services to
the political subdivision:
(a) Any revised response plan resulting from the review; or
(b) A written certification that the most recent response plan
filed pursuant to subsection 1 is the current response plan for the
political subdivision.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, a plan filed
pursuant to the requirements of this section, including any revisions
adopted thereto, is confidential and must be securely maintained by
the entities with whom it is filed pursuant to subsection 1 or 3. An
officer, employee or other person to whom the plan is entrusted by
the entity with whom it is filed shall not disclose the contents of
such a plan except:
(a) Upon the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
(b) As is reasonably necessary in the case of an act of terrorism
or related emergency; or
(c) Pursuant to the provisions of NRS 239.0115.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 9. NRS 239C.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.270 1. Each utility and each provider of new electric
resources shall:
(a) Conduct a vulnerability assessment in accordance with the
requirements of the federal and regional agencies that regulate the
utility or provider; and
(b) Prepare and maintain an emergency response plan in
accordance with the requirements of the federal and regional
agencies that regulate the utility or provider.
2. Each utility shall:
(a) As soon as practicable but not later than December 31, 2003,
submit its vulnerability assessment and emergency response plan to
the [Division;] Office; and
(b) At least once each year thereafter, review its vulnerability
assessment and emergency response plan and, as soon as practicable
after its review is completed but not later than December 31 of each
year, submit the results of its review and any additions or
modifications to its emergency response plan to the [Division.]
Office.
3. Each provider of new electric resources shall:
(a) As soon as practicable but not later than December 31, 2019,
submit its vulnerability assessment and emergency response plan to
the [Division;] Office; and
(b) At least once each year thereafter, review its vulnerability
assessment and emergency response plan and, as soon as practicable
after its review is completed but not later than December 31 of each
year, submit the results of its review and any additions or
modifications to its emergency response plan to the [Division.]
Office.
4. On or before June 30 of each year, the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada, the Division of Environmental Protection
of the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources and
the Office of Energy shall coordinate with the [Division] Office to
compile a list of each utility and provider of new electric resources
required to submit a vulnerability assessment and an emergency
response plan pursuant to subsection 2 or 3.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, each
vulnerability assessment and emergency response plan of a utility or
provider of new electric resources and any other information
concerning a utility or provider that is necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section is confidential and must be securely
maintained by each person or entity that has possession, custody or
control of the information.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239C.210, a person
shall not disclose such information, except:
(a) Upon the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
(b) As is reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section or the operations of the utility or provider of new electric
resources, as determined by the [Division;] Office;
(c) As is reasonably necessary in the case of an emergency
involving public health or safety, as determined by the [Division;]
Office; or
(d) Pursuant to the provisions of NRS 239.0115.
7. If a person knowingly and unlawfully discloses such
information or assists, solicits or conspires with another person to
disclose such information, the person is guilty of:
(a) A gross misdemeanor; or
(b) A category C felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130 if the person acted with the intent to:
(1) Commit, cause, aid, further or conceal, or attempt to
commit, cause, aid, further or conceal, any unlawful act involving
terrorism or sabotage; or
(2) Assist, solicit or conspire with another person to commit,
cause, aid, further or conceal any unlawful act involving terrorism
or sabotage.
8. As used in this section, “provider of new electric resources”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 704B.130.
Sec. 10. NRS 239C.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.300 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if
the State, a political subdivision or a tribal government submits an
application to and is approved to receive money from the Federal
Government, this State, any other state, a local government, any
agency or instrumentality of those governmental entities, or any
private entity, to pay for a project or program relating to the
prevention of, detection of, mitigation of, preparedness for, response
to and recovery from acts of terrorism, the State, political
subdivision or tribal government shall, not later than 60 days after
receiving such approval, submit to the Commission a written report
that includes, without limitation:
(a) The total amount of money that the State, political
subdivision or tribal government has been approved to receive for
the project or program;
(b) A description of the project or program, unless the State,
political subdivision or tribal government previously submitted a
written report pursuant to this section relating to the same project or
program; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(c) The items to be paid for with the money that the State,
political subdivision or tribal government has been approved to
receive for the project or program.
2. A project or program for which the State, a political
subdivision or a tribal government is required to report the receipt of
money pursuant to subsection 1 includes, without limitation, a
project or program related to:
(a) Homeland security;
(b) Emergency management;
(c) Health or hospitals;
(d) Emergency medical services; and
(e) Chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, explosive,
agricultural or environmental acts of terrorism.
3. A report is not required to be submitted to the Commission
if the money was awarded by the [Division] Office pursuant to the
regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 414.040.
Sec. 11. NRS 239C.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.310 1. The State and each political subdivision and
tribal government shall:
(a) Adopt any national system that is required as a condition to
the receipt of money from the Federal Government by the United
States Department of Homeland Security pursuant to federal law in
preparation for, prevention of, detection of, mitigation of, response
to and recovery from a domestic incident, including, without
limitation, an act of terrorism.
(b) Submit to the [Division] Office documentation evidencing
that the State, political subdivision or tribal government has adopted
the national system.
2. The [Division] Office shall submit on a quarterly basis
documentation to the Commission evidencing the compliance of this
State and each political subdivision and tribal government with the
provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
Sec. 12. NRS 239C.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.400 1. The Nevada Resilience Advisory Committee is
hereby created.
2. With the approval of the [Adjutant General of the Office of
the Military,] Governor, the Chief of the [Division] Office shall
appoint to the Committee not more than 34 voting members that the
Chief determines to be appropriate and who have expertise in:
(a) Emergency management;
(b) Homeland security;
(c) Public safety;
(d) Cybersecurity;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(e) School safety; or
(f) Public health.
3. With the approval of the [Adjutant General of the Office of
the Military,] Governor, the Chief of the Office or his or her
designee shall:
(a) Serve as the Chair and a voting member of the Committee;
and
(b) Appoint one voting member of the Committee to serve as
Vice Chair.
4. The term of office of each voting member of the Committee
is 2 years. This term limit does not apply to the Chair. A member
may be reappointed.
Sec. 13. NRS 239C.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.440 The Nevada Resilience Advisory Committee shall,
within the limits of available money:
1. Annually develop state resilience goals and related
objectives for the Committee;
2. Formulate advisory recommendations and policies regarding
the emergency management, emergency response and homeland
security efforts for the State, as well as statewide mitigation,
preparedness, response and recovery efforts;
3. In accordance with the state resilience goals and related
objectives developed pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Review grants proposed by state agencies, political
subdivisions or tribal governments that are responsible for homeland
security and make recommendations and provide related advice
concerning such grants to the Committee on Finance appointed
pursuant to NRS 239C.170;
(b) Review grants proposed by agencies of this State, political
subdivisions or tribal governments that are responsible for
emergency management or emergency response and make
recommendations and provide related advice concerning such grants
to the Chief of the [Division;] Office; and
(c) Review statewide mitigation, preparedness, response and
recovery efforts in consultation with political subdivisions and tribal
governments and make recommendations to such political
subdivisions and tribal governments concerning these coordination
efforts; and
4. Develop the annual report required pursuant to
NRS 239C.480.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
Sec. 14. NRS 239C.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.460 The Chief of the [Division] Office shall provide such
staff assistance to the Nevada Resilience Advisory Committee as the
Chief deems appropriate.
Sec. 15. NRS 281.149 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.149 1. Any public officer or employee of the State or any
agency thereof, or of a political subdivision or an agency of a
political subdivision, who is an emergency communications
technician must be relieved from the officer’s or employee’s duties,
upon the request of the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military] Governor or a
local organization for emergency management and the approval of
the employer of the officer or employee, to assist the [Division]
Office of Emergency Management or local organization for
emergency management during a disaster or emergency that occurs
in this state, California, Oregon, Idaho, Utah or Arizona, without
loss of the officer’s or employee’s regular compensation for a period
of not more than 15 working days in any calendar year. No such
absence may be a part of the annual vacation of the public officer or
employee which is provided for by law.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Disaster” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 414.0335.
(b) “Emergency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 414.0345.
(c) “Emergency communications technician” means a person
who is:
(1) Licensed by the Federal Communications Commission as
an amateur radio operator; and
(2) A member of:
(I) The Radio Amateur Civil Emergency Service or a
successor organization sponsored by the agency of the Federal
Government for emergency management; or
(II) The Amateur Radio Emergency Service or a
successor organization sponsored by the American Radio Relay
League or its successor.
(d) “Local organization for emergency management” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 414.036.
Sec. 16. NRS 289.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
289.270 1. The following persons have the powers of a peace
officer:
(a) The Director of the Department of Public Safety.
(b) The chiefs of the divisions of the Department of Public
Safety.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(c) The deputy directors of the Department of Public Safety
employed pursuant to NRS 480.120.
(d) The sworn personnel of the Department of Public Safety.
(e) The Chief of the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military.] Governor.
2. Administrators and investigators of the Division of
Compliance Enforcement of the Department of Motor Vehicles have
the powers of a peace officer to enforce any law of the State of
Nevada in carrying out their duties pursuant to NRS 481.048.
3. Officers and investigators of the Section for the Control of
Emissions From Vehicles and the Enforcement of Matters Related
to the Use of Special Fuel of the Department of Motor Vehicles,
appointed pursuant to NRS 481.0481, have the powers of peace
officers in carrying out their duties under that section.
Sec. 17. Chapter 353 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Office” means the Office of Emergency Management within
the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 18. NRS 353.2705 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.2705 As used in NRS 353.2705 to 353.2771, inclusive,
and section 17 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 353.2707 to 353.2731, inclusive,
and section 17 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 19. NRS 353.271 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.271 “Disaster” means a fire, flood, earthquake, drought,
explosion, civil disturbance, crisis involving violence on school
property, at a school activity or on a school bus, or any other
occurrence or threatened occurrence that, regardless of cause:
1. Results in, or may result in, widespread or severe damage to
property or injury to or the death of persons in this State; and
2. As determined by:
(a) The Governor; or
(b) The governing body of a local government pursuant to NRS
414.090 or an agreement entered into pursuant to NRS 353.2739
and the [Division] Office pursuant to NRS 353.2753,
 requires immediate action to protect the health, safety and
welfare of the residents of this State.
Sec. 20. NRS 353.2735 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.2735 1. The Disaster Relief Account is hereby created in
the State General Fund. The Interim Finance Committee shall
administer the Disaster Relief Account.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
2. The [Division] Office may accept grants, gifts or donations
for deposit in the Disaster Relief Account. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3, money received from:
(a) A direct legislative appropriation to the Disaster Relief
Account;
(b) A transfer from the State General Fund in an amount equal
to not more than 10 percent of the aggregate balance in the Account
to Stabilize the Operation of the State Government made pursuant to
NRS 353.288; and
(c) A grant, gift or donation to the Disaster Relief Account,
 must be deposited in the Disaster Relief Account. Except as
otherwise provided in NRS 414.135, the interest and income earned
on the money in the Disaster Relief Account must, after deducting
any applicable charges, be credited to the Disaster Relief Account.
3. If, at the end of each quarter of a fiscal year, the balance in
the Disaster Relief Account exceeds 0.75 percent of the total amount
of all appropriations from the State General Fund for the operation
of all departments, institutions and agencies of State Government
and authorized expenditures from the State General Fund for the
regulation of gaming for that fiscal year, the State Controller shall
not, until the balance in the Disaster Relief Account is 0.75 percent
or less of that amount, transfer any money in the Account to
Stabilize the Operation of the State Government from the State
General Fund to the Disaster Relief Account pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 353.288.
4. Money in the Disaster Relief Account may be used for any
purpose authorized by the Legislature or distributed through grants
to persons who own and occupy homes damaged by a disaster
pursuant to NRS 353.2737 or through grants and loans to state
agencies and local governments as provided in NRS 353.2705 to
353.2771, inclusive. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 353.276,
grants to state agencies and local governments will be disbursed on
the basis of reimbursement of costs authorized pursuant to NRS
353.274 and 353.2745.
5. If the State Board of Examiners receives a notice submitted
to and forwarded by the [Division] Office pursuant to subsections 1
and 2 of NRS 353.2755, the State Board of Examiners shall
estimate:
(a) The money in the Disaster Relief Account that is available
for grants and loans for the disaster that is the subject of the notice
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 353.2705 to 353.2771, inclusive;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
(b) The anticipated amount of those grants and loans for the
disaster.
 Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the anticipated
amount determined pursuant to paragraph (b) exceeds the available
money in the Disaster Relief Account for such grants and loans, all
grants and loans from the Disaster Relief Account for the disaster
must be reduced in the same proportion that the anticipated amount
of the grants and loans exceeds the money in the Disaster Relief
Account that is available for grants and loans for the disaster. If the
reduction of a grant or loan from the Disaster Relief Account would
result in a reduction in the amount of money that may be received
by a state agency or local government from the Federal
Government, the reduction in the grant or loan must not be made.
Sec. 21. NRS 353.2737 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.2737 1. The [Division] Office shall establish a revolving
account within the State General Fund for the awarding of grants by
the [Division] Office from the revolving account to persons who
own and occupy homes damaged by a disaster for costs related to
the damages.
2. Upon the declaration of a disaster pursuant to NRS 414.070,
the Chief of the [Division] Office may request approval of the
Interim Finance Committee for the transfer of money from the
Disaster Relief Account to the revolving account. The Interim
Finance Committee shall not approve such a transfer of money to
the revolving account if the transfer would result in a balance in the
revolving account that is more than 25 percent of the balance of the
Disaster Relief Account.
3. The [Division] Office shall adopt such regulations as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including,
without limitation, regulations prescribing standards for eligibility
for a grant pursuant to this section.
Sec. 22. NRS 353.2739 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.2739 1. The Attorney General may enter into an
agreement with a tribal government to provide for the distribution of
money from the Account as a grant or loan to the tribal government
because of a disaster. The provisions of such an agreement must
require:
(a) The tribal government to substantially comply with the
provisions of NRS 353.2705 to 353.2771, inclusive, as those
provisions apply to a local government; and
(b) The [Division] Office to administer such a grant or loan.
2. “Tribal government” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239C.105.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
Sec. 23. NRS 353.2753 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.2753 1. A state agency or local government may request
the [Division] Office to provide technical assistance to the state
agency or local government by conducting an assessment of the
damages related to an event for which the state agency or local
government seeks a grant or loan from the Account.
2. Upon receipt of such a request, the [Division] Office shall:
(a) Notify the State Board of Examiners of the request;
(b) Investigate the event or cause the event to be investigated to
make an assessment of the damages related to the event; and
(c) Make or cause to be made a written report of the damages.
3. As soon as practicable after completion of the investigation
and preparation of the report of damages, the [Division] Office
shall:
(a) Determine whether the event constitutes a disaster for which
the state agency or local government may seek a grant or loan from
the Account; and
(b) Submit the report prepared pursuant to this section and its
written determination regarding whether the event constitutes a
disaster to the state agency or local government.
4. The [Division] Office shall prescribe by regulation the
information that must be included in a report of damages, including,
without limitation, a description of the damage caused by the event,
an estimate of the costs to repair such damage and a specification of
whether the purpose of the project is for repair or replacement,
emergency response or mitigation.
Sec. 24. NRS 353.2754 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.2754 A local government may request a grant or loan from
the Account if:
1. Pursuant to NRS 414.090 or an agreement entered into
pursuant to NRS 353.2739, the governing body of the local
government determines that an event which has occurred constitutes
a disaster; and
2. After the [Division] Office conducts an assessment of the
damages pursuant to NRS 353.2753, the [Division] Office
determines that an event has occurred that constitutes a disaster.
Sec. 25. NRS 353.2755 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.2755 1. Not later than 60 days after the Governor, in the
case of a notice by a state agency, or the governing body of a local
government determines that an event constitutes a disaster, a state
agency or local government may submit to the [Division] Office a
written notice of the state agency’s or local government’s intention
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
to request a grant or loan from the Account as provided in NRS
353.2705 to 353.2771, inclusive, if:
(a) The agency or local government finds that, because of a
disaster, it is unable to pay for an expense or grant match specified
in NRS 353.274, 353.2745 or 353.2751 from money appropriated or
otherwise available to the agency or local government;
(b) The request has been approved by the chief administrative
officer of the state agency or the governing body of the local
government; and
(c) If the requester is an incorporated city, the city has requested
financial assistance from the county and was denied all or a portion
of the requested assistance.
2. Not later than 10 working days after it receives a notice from
a state agency or local government pursuant to subsection 1, the
[Division] Office shall forward a copy of the notice to the State
Board of Examiners and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau.
3. A request by a state agency or local government for a grant
or loan from the Account:
(a) Must be submitted to the [Division] Office and the
Department of Taxation not later than 18 months after the Governor,
in the case of a request by a state agency, or the governing body of
the local government determines that an event constitutes a disaster,
unless the Chief of the [Division] Office grants an extension of time;
and
(b) Must include:
(1) A statement specifying whether the request is for a grant
or loan and setting forth the amount of money requested by the state
agency or local government;
(2) An assessment of the need of the state agency or local
government for the money requested;
(3) If the request is submitted by a local government that has
established a fund pursuant to NRS 354.6115 to mitigate the effects
of a natural disaster, a statement of the amount of money that is
available in that fund, if any, for the payment of expenses incurred
by the local government as a result of a disaster;
(4) A determination of the type, value and amount of
resources the state agency or local government may be required to
provide as a condition for the receipt of a grant or loan from the
Account;
(5) A written report of damages prepared by the [Division]
Office and the written determination made by the [Division] Office
that the event constitutes a disaster pursuant to NRS 353.2753; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
(6) If the requester is an incorporated city, all documents
which relate to a request for assistance submitted to the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the city is located.
 Any additional documentation relating to the request that is
requested by the [Division] Office or the Department of Taxation
must be submitted to the [Division] Office or the Department, as the
case may be, within 10 working days after the date of the
[Division’s] Office’s or the Department’s request unless the Chief of
the [Division] Office or the Executive Director of the Department,
as applicable, or his or her designee, grants an extension.
4. Not later than 60 days after the [Division] Office receives a
request for a grant or loan and receives any additional information
requested by the [Division,] Office, the [Division] Office shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, review the
request to determine whether it contains the information necessary
for the State Board of Examiners and the Interim Finance
Committee to act upon the request and otherwise complies with the
requirements of NRS 353.2705 to 353.2771, inclusive;
(b) Prepare a written report of the determination required by
paragraph (a);
(c) Submit a copy of the request and its report to the State Board
of Examiners and to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau; and
(d) Provide a copy of its report to the state agency or local
government, as applicable, and the Department of Taxation.
 The [Division] Office shall coordinate its review of the request
with the Department of Taxation to ensure, to the extent practicable,
that the [Division’s] Office’s review does not duplicate the review
conducted by the Department pursuant to subsection 5.
5. Not later than 60 days after the Department of Taxation
receives a request for a grant or loan and receives any additional
information requested by the Department, the Department shall:
(a) Review any financial information submitted in support of the
request which the Department believes to be relevant, including,
without limitation:
(1) The report of damages prepared by the [Division] Office
pursuant to NRS 353.2753;
(2) Information relating to the expenses for which the grant
or loan is requested;
(3) If the requester is a local government and is requesting a
loan, information relating to the current ability of the local
government to meet its financial obligations; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
(4) If the requester is a local government and is requesting a
grant or loan for the payment of any grant match described in NRS
353.2745 or 353.2751, information relating to the grant or grant
match;
(b) Prepare a written report of its findings;
(c) Submit a copy of its report to the State Board of Examiners
and to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau; and
(d) Provide a copy of the report to the state agency or local
government, as applicable, and the [Division.] Office.
6. Upon its receipt of a request for a grant or loan submitted
pursuant to this section and the reports of the [Division] Office and
the Department of Taxation relating to the request, the State Board
of Examiners:
(a) Shall consider the request and the reports; and
(b) May require any additional information that it determines is
necessary to make a recommendation.
7. If the State Board of Examiners finds that a grant or loan is
appropriate, it shall include in its recommendation to the Interim
Finance Committee the proposed amount of the grant or loan. If the
State Board of Examiners recommends a grant, it shall include a
recommendation regarding whether or not the state agency or local
government requires an advance to avoid severe financial hardship.
If the State Board of Examiners recommends a loan for a local
government, it shall include the information required pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 353.2765. If the State Board of Examiners
finds that a grant or loan is not appropriate, it shall include in its
recommendation the reason for its determination.
8. The provisions of this section do not prohibit a state agency
or local government from submitting more than one request for a
grant or loan from the Account.
9. As used in this section, the term “natural disaster” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 354.6115.
Sec. 26. NRS 353.353 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.353 1. If, during a state of emergency or declaration of
disaster proclaimed pursuant to NRS 414.070, the Chief of the
[Division] Office of Emergency Management [of] within the Office
of the [Military] Governor determines that the balance in the
Emergency Assistance Account created by NRS 414.135 is
insufficient to cover the expenses relating to the emergency or
disaster that are authorized pursuant to NRS 414.135, the Chief may
request from the Director of the Office of Finance a temporary
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
advance from the State General Fund to the Emergency Assistance
Account for the payment of those expenses.
2. The Director of the Office of Finance shall notify the State
Controller and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau of his or her approval of a request made pursuant to
subsection 1. The State Controller shall draw his or her warrant
upon receipt of the approval by the Director of the Office of
Finance.
3. Any money which is advanced from the State General Fund
to the Emergency Assistance Account pursuant to subsection 1 must
be repaid as soon as the money which the advance replaced is
deposited in the Emergency Assistance Account.
Sec. 27. NRS 388.1324 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.1324 1. The Governor shall appoint a committee on
statewide school safety. Appointments must be made to represent
each of the geographic areas of the State.
2. The committee must consist of:
(a) One representative of the Department of Education;
(b) One representative of the Department of Public Safety;
(c) One representative of the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military;] Governor;
(d) One representative of the Department of Health and Human
Services;
(e) One representative who is a licensed teacher in this State;
(f) One representative who is the principal of a school in this
State;
(g) One superintendent of a school district in this State;
(h) One school resource officer assigned to a school in this
State;
(i) One person employed as a paraprofessional, as defined in
NRS 391.008, by a school in this State;
(j) One school psychologist employed by a school in this State;
(k) One provider of mental health other than a psychologist who
provides services to pupils at a school in this State;
(l) The State Fire Marshal or his or her designee;
(m) One parent or legal guardian of a pupil enrolled in a school
in this State;
(n) At least two pupils enrolled in a school in this State; and
(o) Any other representative the Governor deems appropriate.
3. The committee shall:
(a) Establish methods which facilitate the ability of a pupil
enrolled in a school in this State to express his or her ideas related to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
school safety and the well-being of pupils enrolled in schools in this
State;
(b) Evaluate the impact of social media on school safety and the
well-being of pupils enrolled in schools in this State; and
(c) Discuss and make recommendations to the Governor and the
Department related to the findings of the committee.
4. As used in this section, “social media” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 232.003.
Sec. 28. NRS 388.243 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.243 1. Each emergency operations plan development
committee established by the board of trustees of a school district
shall develop one plan, which constitutes the minimum requirements
of a plan, to be used by all the public schools other than the charter
schools in the school district in responding to a crisis, emergency or
suicide and all other hazards. Each emergency operations plan
development committee established by the governing body of a
charter school shall develop a plan, which constitutes the minimum
requirements of a plan, to be used by the charter school in
responding to a crisis, emergency or suicide and all other hazards.
Each emergency operations plan development committee shall,
when developing the plan:
(a) Consult with local social service agencies and local public
safety agencies in the county in which its school district or charter
school is located.
(b) If the school district has an emergency manager designated
pursuant to NRS 388.262, consult with the emergency manager.
(c) If the school district has school resource officers, consult
with the school resource officer or a person designated by him or
her.
(d) If the school district has school police officers, consult with
the chief of school police of the school district or a person
designated by him or her.
(e) Consult with the director of the local organization for
emergency management or, if there is no local organization for
emergency management, with the Chief of the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the [Military]
Governor or his or her designee.
(f) Consult with the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee
and a representative of a local government responsible for
enforcement of the ordinances, codes or other regulations governing
fire safety.
(g) Determine which persons and organizations in the
community, including, without limitation, a provider of mental
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
health services which is operated by a state or local agency, that
could be made available to assist pupils and staff in recovering from
a crisis, emergency or suicide.
2. The plan developed pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) The plans, procedures and information included in the model
plan developed by the Department pursuant to NRS 388.253;
(b) A procedure for responding to a crisis or an emergency and
for responding during the period after a crisis or an emergency has
concluded, including, without limitation, a crisis or an emergency
that results in immediate physical harm to a pupil or employee of a
school in the school district or the charter school;
(c) A procedure for enforcing discipline within a school in the
school district or the charter school and for obtaining and
maintaining a safe and orderly environment during a crisis or an
emergency;
(d) The names of persons and organizations in the community,
including, without limitation, a provider of mental health services
which is operated by a state or local agency, that are available to
provide counseling and other services to pupils and staff of the
school to assist them in recovering from a crisis, emergency or
suicide;
(e) A plan for making the persons and organizations described in
paragraph (d) available to pupils and staff after a crisis, emergency
or suicide;
(f) A procedure for responding to a crisis or an emergency that
occurs during an extracurricular activity which takes place on school
grounds;
(g) A plan which includes strategies to assist pupils and staff at a
school in recovering from a suicide;
(h) A description of the organizational structure which ensures
there is a clearly defined hierarchy of authority and responsibility
used by the school for the purpose of responding to a crisis,
emergency or suicide;
(i) If the school district has school police officers, a plan to
coordinate with local law enforcement agencies to train school
police officers in active assailant movement techniques;
(j) A plan to coordinate with local law enforcement agencies or
public safety organizations to provide active assailant trainings to
each employee of the school;
(k) A plan to provide support to:
(1) Pupils who have experienced a crisis or emergency by
using trauma-informed and age-appropriate resources; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
(2) Members of the faculty and staff who have experienced a
crisis or emergency by using trauma-informed resources;
(l) A plan to ensure that members of the faculty and staff and a
pupil’s parents or legal guardians are notified of the occurrence,
development and conclusion of a crisis or an emergency through
any communication method established by a school, including,
without limitation, communicating through text message or
electronic mail; and
(m) A plan to inform, at least twice each academic year, a
pupil’s parent or legal guardian of any state requirement related to
the storage of firearms, including, without limitation, the crimes and
penalties described in subsection 5 of NRS 202.300 and 202.3623.
3. Each emergency operations plan development committee
shall provide for review a copy of the plan that it develops pursuant
to this section to the board of trustees of the school district that
established the committee or the governing body of the charter
school that established the committee.
4. The board of trustees of the school district that established
the committee or the governing body of the charter school that
established the committee shall submit for review to the [Division]
Office of Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the
[Military] Governor the plan developed pursuant to this section.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 388.249 and 388.251,
each public school must comply with the plan developed for it
pursuant to this section.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Active assailant movement techniques” means any training
in the technical and tactical skills necessary for school police
officers to respond to a crisis or emergency concerning an active
assailant.
(b) “Active assailant training” means any training in responding
to a crisis or emergency concerning an active assailant that is
necessary to evacuate or secure the school.
Sec. 29. NRS 388.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.245 1. Each emergency operations plan development
committee shall, at least once each year, review and update as
appropriate the plan that it developed pursuant to NRS 388.243. In
reviewing and updating the plan, the emergency operations plan
development committee shall consult with the director of the local
organization for emergency management or, if there is no local
organization for emergency management, with the Chief of the
[Division] Office of Emergency Management [of] within the Office
of the [Military] Governor or his or her designee.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
2. On or before August 1 of each year, each emergency
operations plan development committee shall provide an updated
copy of the plan to the board of trustees of the school district that
established the committee or the governing body of the charter
school that established the committee.
3. On or before August 15 of each year, the board of trustees of
the school district that established the committee or the governing
body of the charter school that established the committee shall
submit for review to the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military] Governor the
plan updated pursuant to subsection 1.
4. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall:
(a) Post a notice of the completion of each review and update
that its emergency operations plan development committee performs
pursuant to subsection 1 on the Internet website maintained by the
school district or governing body and by each school in the school
district or by the charter school, as applicable;
(b) File with the Department a copy of the notice posted
pursuant to paragraph (a);
(c) Post a link to NRS 388.229 to 388.266, inclusive, on the
Internet website maintained by each school in its school district or
by the charter school;
(d) Retain a copy of each plan developed pursuant to NRS
388.243, each plan updated pursuant to subsection 1 and each
deviation approved pursuant to NRS 388.251;
(e) Provide a copy of each plan developed pursuant to NRS
388.243 and each plan updated pursuant to subsection 1 to:
(1) Each local public safety agency in the county in which
the school district or charter school is located; and
(2) The local organization for emergency management, if
any;
(f) Upon request, provide a copy of each plan developed
pursuant to NRS 388.243 and each plan updated pursuant to
subsection 1 to a local agency that is included in the plan and to an
employee of a school who is included in the plan;
(g) Provide a copy of each deviation approved pursuant to NRS
388.251 as soon as practicable to:
(1) The Department;
(2) A local public safety agency in the county in which the
school district or charter school is located;
(3) The [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military;] Governor;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(4) The local organization for emergency management, if
any;
(5) A local agency that is included in the plan; and
(6) An employee of a school who is included in the plan; and
(h) At least once each year, provide training in responding to a
crisis and training in responding to an emergency to each employee
of the school district or of the charter school, including, without
limitation, training concerning drills for evacuating and securing
schools.
5. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school may apply for and accept
gifts, grants and contributions from any public or private source to
carry out the provisions of NRS 388.229 to 388.266, inclusive.
Sec. 30. NRS 388.246 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.246 The [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military:] Governor:
1. Shall prepare a report regarding the extent to which:
(a) The board of trustees of each school district, governing body
of a charter school and each public school has complied with the
provisions of NRS 388.243 and 388.245; and
(b) Each private school has complied with the provisions of
NRS 394.1687 and 394.1688;
2. Shall, on or before January 1 of each year, submit the report
prepared pursuant to subsection 1 to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature or, if the
Legislature is not in session, to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education; and
3. May conduct on a random basis audits of any plan submitted
pursuant to NRS 388.243 and 388.245.
Sec. 31. NRS 388.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.253 1. The Department shall, with assistance from other
state agencies, including, without limitation, the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the [Military]
Governor and the Investigation Division and the Nevada Highway
Patrol Division of the Department of Public Safety, develop a model
plan for the management of:
(a) A suicide;
(b) A crisis or emergency that involves a public school or a
private school and that requires immediate action; and
(c) All other hazards.
2. The model plan must include, without limitation, a
procedure for:
(a) In response to a crisis or emergency:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
(1) Coordinating the resources of local, state and federal
agencies, officers and employees, as appropriate;
(2) Accounting for all persons within a school;
(3) Assisting persons within a school in a school district, a
charter school or a private school to communicate with each other;
(4) Assisting persons within a school in a school district, a
charter school or a private school to communicate with persons
located outside the school, including, without limitation, relatives of
pupils and relatives of employees of such a school, the news media
and persons from local, state or federal agencies that are responding
to a crisis or an emergency;
(5) Assisting pupils of a school in the school district, a
charter school or a private school, employees of such a school and
relatives of such pupils and employees to move safely within and
away from the school, including, without limitation, a procedure for
evacuating the school and a procedure for securing the school;
(6) Reunifying a pupil with his or her parent or legal
guardian;
(7) Providing any necessary medical assistance;
(8) Recovering from a crisis or emergency;
(9) Carrying out a lockdown at a school;
(10) Providing shelter in specific areas of a school; and
(11) Providing disaster behavioral health related to a crisis,
emergency or suicide;
(b) Providing specific information relating to managing a crisis
or emergency that is a result of:
(1) An incident involving hazardous materials;
(2) An incident involving mass casualties;
(3) An incident involving an active shooter;
(4) An incident involving a fire, explosion or other similar
situation;
(5) An outbreak of disease, including, without limitation, an
epidemic;
(6) Any threat or hazard identified in the hazard mitigation
plan of the county in which the school district is located, if such a
plan exists; or
(7) Any other situation, threat or hazard deemed appropriate;
(c) Providing pupils and staff at a school that has experienced a
crisis or emergency with access to counseling and other resources to
assist in recovering from the crisis or emergency;
(d) Evacuating pupils and employees of a charter school to a
designated space within an identified public middle school, junior
high school or high school in a school district that is separate from
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
the general population of the school and large enough to
accommodate the charter school, and such a space may include,
without limitation, a gymnasium or multipurpose room of the public
school;
(e) Selecting an assessment tool which assists in responding to a
threat against the school by a pupil or pupils;
(f) On an annual basis, providing drills to instruct pupils in the
appropriate procedures to be followed in response to a crisis or an
emergency. Such drills must occur:
(1) At different times during normal school hours; and
(2) In cooperation with other state agencies, pursuant to this
section.
(g) Responding to a suicide or attempted suicide to mitigate the
effects of the suicide or attempted suicide on pupils and staff at the
school, including, without limitation, by making counseling and
other appropriate resources to assist in recovering from the suicide
or attempted suicide available to pupils and staff;
(h) Providing counseling and other appropriate resources to
pupils and school staff who have contemplated or attempted suicide;
(i) Outreach to persons and organizations located in the
community in which a school that has had a suicide by a pupil,
including, without limitation, religious and other nonprofit
organizations, that may be able to assist with the response to the
suicide;
(j) Addressing the needs of pupils at a school that has
experienced a crisis, emergency or suicide who are at a high risk of
suicide, including, without limitation, pupils who are members of
the groups described in subsection 3 of NRS 388.256; and
(k) Responding to a pupil who is determined to be a person in
mental health crisis, as defined in NRS 433A.0175, including,
without limitation:
(1) Utilizing mobile mental health crisis response units,
where available, before transporting the pupil to a public or private
mental health facility pursuant to subparagraph (2); and
(2) Transporting the pupil to a public or private mental health
facility or hospital for placement on a mental health crisis hold
pursuant to NRS 433A.160.
3. In developing the model plan, the Department shall consider
the plans developed pursuant to NRS 388.243 and 394.1687 and
updated pursuant to NRS 388.245 and 394.1688.
4. The Department shall require a school district to ensure that
each public school in the school district identified pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 2 is prepared to allow a charter school to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
evacuate to the school when necessary in accordance with the
procedure included in the model plan developed pursuant to
subsection 1. A charter school shall hold harmless, indemnify and
defend the school district to which it evacuates during a crisis or an
emergency against any claim or liability arising from an act or
omission by the school district or an employee or officer of the
school district.
5. The Department may disseminate to any appropriate local,
state or federal agency, officer or employee, as the Department
determines is necessary:
(a) The model plan developed by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1;
(b) A plan developed pursuant to NRS 388.243 or updated
pursuant to NRS 388.245;
(c) A plan developed pursuant to NRS 394.1687 or updated
pursuant to NRS 394.1688; and
(d) A deviation approved pursuant to NRS 388.251 or 394.1692.
6. The Department shall, at least once each year, review and
update as appropriate the model plan developed pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 32. NRS 388.257 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.257 1. If a crisis or an emergency that requires
immediate action occurs at a public school or a suicide occurs, the
principal of the school involved, or the principal’s designated
representative, shall, in accordance with the plan developed for the
school pursuant to NRS 388.243 and in accordance with any
deviation approved pursuant to NRS 388.251, contact all
appropriate local agencies, including, without limitation, a provider
of mental health services which is operated by a state or local
agency, to respond to the crisis, emergency or suicide.
2. If a local agency that is responsible for responding to a crisis
or an emergency is contacted pursuant to subsection 1 and the local
agency determines that the crisis or the emergency requires
assistance from a state agency, the local agency may:
(a) If a local organization for emergency management has been
established in the city or county in which the local agency that was
contacted is located, through such local organization for emergency
management, notify the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military] Governor of
the crisis or the emergency and request assistance from the
[Division] Office of Emergency Management in responding to the
crisis or the emergency; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
(b) If a local organization for emergency management has not
been established in the city or county in which the local agency that
was contacted is located, directly notify the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the [Military]
Governor of the crisis or the emergency and request assistance from
the [Division] Office of Emergency Management in responding to
the crisis or the emergency.
3. If the [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military] Governor receives notification of
a crisis or an emergency and a request for assistance pursuant to
subsection 2 and the Governor or the Governor’s designated
representative determines that the crisis or the emergency requires
assistance from a state agency, the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management shall carry out its duties set forth in the model plan
developed pursuant to NRS 388.253 and its duties set forth in
chapter 414 of NRS, including, without limitation, addressing the
immediate crisis or emergency and coordinating the appropriate and
available local, state and federal resources to provide support
services and counseling to pupils, teachers, and parents or legal
guardians of pupils, and providing support for law enforcement
agencies, for as long as is reasonably necessary.
4. If a local law enforcement agency responds to a crisis,
emergency or suicide that occurs at a public school or notifies a
public school regarding a crisis, emergency or suicide that occurs
outside of the public school, the local law enforcement agency must
consider whether it is necessary and appropriate to notify any other
public school or any private school of the crisis, emergency or
suicide. Such notification must include, without limitation, any
information necessary for the public school or private school to
appropriately respond to the crisis, emergency or suicide.
Sec. 33. NRS 388.261 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.261 The provisions of chapter 241 of NRS do not apply to
a meeting of:
1. An emergency operations plan development committee;
2. A school committee;
3. The board of trustees of a school district or governing body
of a charter school if the meeting concerns the review of a plan
submitted pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 388.243 or a summary
presented or provided pursuant to paragraph (e) or (i) of subsection
2 of NRS 388.910;
4. The State Board if the meeting concerns a regulation
adopted pursuant to NRS 388.255;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
5. The Department of Education if the meeting concerns the
model plan developed pursuant to NRS 388.253; or
6. The [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military] Governor if the meeting concerns
the review of a plan developed pursuant to NRS 388.243 or the
review of a plan updated pursuant to NRS 388.245.
Sec. 34. NRS 388.264 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.264 1. The board of trustees of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall consult with the
person described in subsection 2 or 3, as applicable, regarding safety
in schools before:
(a) Designing, constructing or purchasing new buildings for
schools or related facilities;
(b) Enlarging, remodeling or renovating existing buildings for
schools or related facilities; or
(c) Acquiring sites for building schools or related facilities.
2. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, the board
of trustees of a school district or the governing body of a charter
school that plans to take an action described in subsection 1 shall
consult with the emergency manager designated pursuant to NRS
388.262 or, if the school district has school police officers, the chief
of school police of the school district or a person designated by him
or her.
3. In a county whose population is less than 100,000, the board
of trustees of a school district or the governing body of a charter
school that plans to take an action described in subsection 1 shall
consult with:
(a) If the school district has school police officers, the chief of
school police of the school district or a person designated by him or
her or, if the school district has designated a full-time employee to
serve as an emergency manager, the emergency manager; or
(b) If the county has not designated a full-time employee to
serve as an emergency manager and does not have school police
officers, the [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military.] Governor.
Sec. 35. NRS 388.265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.265 1. The Department of Education shall, at least once
each year, coordinate with the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military,] Governor, any
emergency manager designated pursuant to NRS 388.262, any chief
of police of a school district that has police officers and any school
resource officer to conduct a conference regarding safety in public
schools.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall designate
persons to attend the conference held pursuant to subsection 1. The
persons so designated must include, without limitation:
(a) An administrator from the school district;
(b) If the school district has school resource officers, a school
resource officer or a person designated by him or her;
(c) If the school district has school police officers, the chief of
school police of the school district or a person designated by him or
her; and
(d) If the school district has an emergency manager designated
pursuant to NRS 388.262, the emergency manager.
3. The conference conducted pursuant to subsection 1 may be
attended by:
(a) A licensed teacher of a school or charter school;
(b) Educational support personnel employed by a school district
or charter school;
(c) The parent or legal guardian of a pupil who is enrolled in a
public school;
(d) An employee of a local law enforcement agency; and
(e) A person employed or appointed to serve as a school police
officer.
4. The State Public Charter School Authority shall annually, at
a designated meeting of the State Public Charter School Authority
or at a workshop or conference coordinated by the State Public
Charter School Authority, discuss safety in charter schools. The
governing body of each charter school shall designate persons to
attend a meeting, workshop or conference at which such a
discussion will take place pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 36. NRS 394.1687 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.1687 1. Each emergency operations plan development
committee shall develop a plan to be used by its school in
responding to a crisis, emergency or suicide and all other hazards.
Each emergency operations plan development committee shall,
when developing the plan:
(a) Consult with local social service agencies and local public
safety agencies in the county in which its school is located.
(b) Consult with the director of the local organization for
emergency management or, if there is no local organization for
emergency management, with the Chief of the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the [Military]
Governor or his or her designee.
2. The plan developed pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
(a) The plans, procedures and information included in the model
plan developed by the Department pursuant to NRS 388.253;
(b) A procedure for immediately responding to a crisis or an
emergency and for responding during the period after a crisis or an
emergency has concluded, including, without limitation, a crisis or
an emergency that results in immediate physical harm to a pupil or
employee of the school; and
(c) A procedure for enforcing discipline within the school and
for obtaining and maintaining a safe and orderly environment during
a crisis or an emergency.
3. Each emergency operations plan development committee
shall provide for review a copy of the plan that it develops pursuant
to this section to the governing body of the school that established
the committee.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 394.1691 and
394.1692, each private school must comply with the plan developed
for it pursuant to this section.
Sec. 37. NRS 394.1688 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.1688 1. Each emergency operations plan development
committee shall, at least once each year, review and update as
appropriate the plan that it developed pursuant to NRS 394.1687. In
reviewing and updating the plan, the emergency operations plan
development committee shall consult with the director of the local
organization for emergency management or, if there is no local
organization for emergency management, with the Chief of the
[Division] Office of Emergency Management [of] within the Office
of the [Military] Governor or his or her designee.
2. On or before August 1 of each year, each emergency
operations plan development committee shall provide an updated
copy of the plan to the governing body of the school.
3. The governing body of each private school shall:
(a) Post a notice of the completion of each review and update
that its emergency operations plan development committee performs
pursuant to subsection 1 on the Internet website maintained by the
school;
(b) File with the Department a copy of the notice posted
pursuant to paragraph (a);
(c) Post a link to NRS 388.253 and 394.168 to 394.1699,
inclusive, on the Internet website maintained by the school;
(d) Retain a copy of each plan developed pursuant to NRS
394.1687, each plan updated pursuant to subsection 1 and each
deviation approved pursuant to NRS 394.1692;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
(e) On or before August 15 of each year, provide a copy of each
plan developed pursuant to NRS 394.1687 and each plan updated
pursuant to subsection 1 to:
(1) Each local public safety agency in the county in which
the school is located;
(2) The [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military;] Governor; and
(3) The local organization for emergency management, if
any;
(f) Upon request, provide a copy of each plan developed
pursuant to NRS 394.1687 and each plan updated pursuant to
subsection 1 to a local agency that is included in the plan and to an
employee of the school who is included in the plan;
(g) Upon request, provide a copy of each deviation approved
pursuant to NRS 394.1692 to:
(1) The Department;
(2) A local public safety agency in the county in which the
school is located;
(3) The [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military;] Governor;
(4) The local organization for emergency management, if
any;
(5) A local agency that is included in the plan; and
(6) An employee of the school who is included in the plan;
and
(h) At least once each year, provide training in responding to a
crisis and training in responding to an emergency to each employee
of the school, including, without limitation, training concerning
drills for evacuating and securing the school.
4. As used in this section, “public safety agency” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388.2345.
Sec. 38. NRS 394.1696 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.1696 1. If a crisis or an emergency that requires
immediate action occurs at a private school or a suicide occurs, the
principal or other person in charge of the private school involved, or
his or her designated representative, shall, in accordance with the
plan developed for the school pursuant to NRS 394.1687 and in
accordance with any deviation approved pursuant to NRS 394.1692,
contact all appropriate local agencies, including, without limitation,
a provider of mental health services which is operated by a state or
local agency, to respond to the crisis, emergency or suicide.
2. If a local agency that is responsible for responding to a crisis
or an emergency is contacted pursuant to subsection 1 and the local
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
agency determines that the crisis or the emergency requires
assistance from a state agency, the local agency may:
(a) If a local organization for emergency management has been
established in the city or county in which the local agency that was
contacted is located, through such local organization for emergency
management, notify the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military] Governor of
the crisis or the emergency and request assistance from the
[Division] Office of Emergency Management in responding to the
crisis or the emergency; or
(b) If a local organization for emergency management has not
been established in the city or county in which the local agency that
was contacted is located, directly notify the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the [Military]
Governor of the crisis or the emergency and request assistance from
the [Division] Office of Emergency Management in responding to
the crisis or the emergency.
3. If the [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military] Governor receives notification of
a crisis or an emergency and a request for assistance pursuant to
subsection 2 and the Governor or the Governor’s designated
representative determines that the crisis or the emergency requires
assistance from a state agency, the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management shall carry out its duties set forth in the model plan
developed pursuant to NRS 388.253 and its duties set forth in
chapter 414 of NRS, including, without limitation, addressing the
immediate crisis or emergency and coordinating the appropriate and
available local, state and federal resources to provide support
services and counseling to pupils, teachers, and parents or legal
guardians of pupils, and providing support for law enforcement
agencies, for as long as is reasonably necessary.
4. If a local law enforcement agency responds to a crisis,
emergency or suicide that occurs at a private school or notifies a
private school regarding a crisis, emergency or suicide that occurs
outside of the private school, the local law enforcement agency must
consider whether it is necessary and appropriate to notify any public
school or any other private school of the crisis, emergency or
suicide. Such notification must include, without limitation, any
information necessary for the public school or private school to
appropriately respond to the crisis, emergency or suicide.
Sec. 39. NRS 412.014 is hereby amended to read as follows:
412.014 “Office” means the Office of the Military, including,
without limitation, the Nevada Army National Guard [,] and the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
Nevada Air National Guard . [and the Division of Emergency
Management.]
Sec. 40. NRS 412.064 is hereby amended to read as follows:
412.064 1. The Office of the Military is hereby established.
The Office, under the direction of the Governor, shall supervise the
military [and emergency management] affairs of the State.
2. The Office shall adopt, subject to the approval of the
Governor, necessary regulations for the organization, government,
armament, equipment, training and compensation of the militia of
the State in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and the
laws of the United States.
3. The Office shall make such changes in the military
organization of the Nevada National Guard as are necessary from
time to time to conform to the requirements of the laws of the
United States and the directives of the National Guard Bureau.
4. The Office shall fix the location of the units and
headquarters of the Nevada National Guard, and shall, subject to the
approval of the National Guard Bureau, transfer, attach, consolidate
or inactivate any organization or unit when in its judgment the
efficiency of the present organization will be increased thereby.
5. The Office may establish and continue awards and
decorations and approve the design therefor, which must conform to
the requirements of the laws of the United States and the directives
of the National Guard Bureau.
[6. The Division of Emergency Management of the Office of
the Military shall execute, administer and enforce the provisions of
chapters 414 and 414A of NRS and perform such duties and
exercise such powers as may be conferred upon it pursuant to
chapters 414 and 414A of NRS and any other statute.]
Sec. 41. Chapter 414 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Office” means the Office of Emergency Management within
the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 42. NRS 414.0315 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.0315 “Chief” means the Chief of the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the [Military.]
Governor.
Sec. 43. NRS 414.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.040 1. [A Division] An Office of Emergency
Management is hereby created within the Office of the [Military.]
Governor. The Chief of the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management is appointed by and holds office at the pleasure of the
[Adjutant General of the Office of the Military.] Governor. The
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
[Division] Office of Emergency Management is the State Agency
for Emergency Management [and the State Agency for Civil
Defense] for the purposes of the Compact ratified by the Legislature
pursuant to NRS 415.010. The Chief is the State’s Director of
Emergency Management [and the State’s Director of Civil Defense]
for the purposes of that Compact.
2. The Chief may employ technical, clerical, stenographic and
other personnel as may be required, and may make such
expenditures therefor and for other expenses of his or her office
within the appropriation therefor, or from other money made
available to him or her for purposes of emergency management, as
may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
3. The Chief, subject to the direction and control of the
[Adjutant General,] Governor, shall carry out the program for
emergency management in this State. The Chief shall coordinate the
activities of all organizations for emergency management within the
State, maintain liaison with and cooperate with agencies and
organizations of other states and of the Federal Government for
emergency management and carry out such additional duties as may
be prescribed by the [Adjutant General.] Governor.
4. The Chief shall assist in the development of comprehensive,
coordinated plans for emergency management by adopting an
integrated process, using the partnership of governmental entities,
business and industry, volunteer organizations and other interested
persons, for the mitigation of, preparation for, response to and
recovery from emergencies or disasters. In adopting this process, the
Chief shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 232.3532, develop
written plans for the mitigation of, preparation for, response to and
recovery from emergencies and disasters. The plans developed by
the Chief pursuant to this paragraph must include the information
prescribed in NRS 414.041 to 414.044, inclusive.
(b) Conduct activities designed to:
(1) Eliminate or reduce the probability that an emergency
will occur or to reduce the effects of unavoidable disasters;
(2) Prepare state and local governmental agencies, private
organizations and other persons to be capable of responding
appropriately if an emergency or disaster occurs by fostering the
adoption of plans for emergency operations, conducting exercises to
test those plans, training necessary personnel and acquiring
necessary resources;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
(3) Test periodically plans for emergency operations to
ensure that the activities of state and local governmental agencies,
private organizations and other persons are coordinated;
(4) Provide assistance to victims, prevent further injury or
damage to persons or property and increase the effectiveness of
recovery operations; and
(5) Restore the operation of vital community life-support
systems and return persons and property affected by an emergency
or disaster to a condition that is comparable to or better than what
existed before the emergency or disaster occurred.
5. In addition to any other requirement concerning the program
of emergency management in this State, the Chief shall:
(a) Maintain an inventory of any state or local services,
equipment, supplies, personnel and other resources related to
participation in the Nevada Intrastate Mutual Aid System
established pursuant to NRS 414A.100;
(b) Coordinate the provision of resources and equipment within
this State in response to requests for mutual aid pursuant to NRS
414.075 or chapter 414A of NRS;
(c) Coordinate with state agencies, local governments, Indian
tribes or nations and special districts to use the personnel and
equipment of those state agencies, local governments, Indian tribes
or nations and special districts as agents of the State during a
response to a request for mutual aid pursuant to NRS 414.075 or
414A.130; and
(d) Provide notice:
(1) On or before February 15 of each year to the governing
body of each political subdivision of whether the political
subdivision has complied with the requirements of NRS 239C.250;
(2) On or before February 15 of each year to the Chair of the
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada of whether each utility that
is not a governmental utility and each provider of new electric
resources has complied with the requirements of NRS 239C.270;
(3) On or before February 15 of each year to the Governor of
whether each governmental utility described in subsection 1 of NRS
239C.050 and each provider of new electric resources has complied
with the requirements of NRS 239C.270;
(4) On or before February 15 of each year to the governing
body of each governmental utility described in subsection 2 of NRS
239C.050 and each provider of new electric resources of whether
each such governmental utility has complied with the requirements
of NRS 239C.270;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
(5) On or before November 15 of each year to the
Superintendent of Public Instruction of whether each board of
trustees of a school district, governing body of a charter school or
governing body of a private school has complied with the
requirements of NRS 388.243 or 394.1687, as applicable; and
(6) On or before November 15 of each year to the Chair of
the Nevada Gaming Control Board of whether each resort hotel has
complied with the requirements of NRS 463.790.
6. The [Division] Office shall:
(a) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of chapters
414 and 414A of NRS and perform such duties and exercise such
powers required pursuant to those chapters;
(b) Perform the duties required pursuant to chapter 415A of
NRS;
[(b)] (c) Perform the duties required pursuant to NRS 353.2753
at the request of a state agency or local government;
[(c)] (d) Adopt regulations setting forth the manner in which
federal funds received by the [Division] Office to finance projects
related to emergency management and homeland security are
allocated, except with respect to any funds committed by specific
statute to the regulatory authority of another person or agency,
including, without limitation, funds accepted by the State
Emergency Response Commission pursuant to NRS 459.740; and
[(d)] (e) Submit a written report to the Nevada Commission on
Homeland Security within 60 days of making a grant of money to a
state agency, political subdivision or tribal government to pay for a
project or program relating to the prevention of, detection of,
mitigation of, preparedness for, response to and recovery from acts
of terrorism that includes, without limitation:
(1) The total amount of money that the state agency, political
subdivision or tribal government has been approved to receive for
the project or program;
(2) A description of the project or program; and
(3) An explanation of how the money may be used by the
state agency, political subdivision or tribal government.
7. The [Division] Office shall develop a written guide for the
preparation and maintenance of an emergency response plan to
assist a person or governmental entity that is required to file a plan
pursuant to NRS 239C.250, 239C.270, 388.243, 394.1687 or
463.790. The [Division] Office shall review the guide on an annual
basis and revise the guide if necessary. On or before January 15 of
each year, the [Division] Office shall post the guide on a publicly
accessible Internet website maintained by the [Division.] Office.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
8. The [Division] Office shall provide a copy of the written
guide developed pursuant to subsection 7 to a person or
governmental entity that is required to file a plan pursuant to NRS
239C.250, 239C.270, 388.243, 394.1687 or 463.790 upon the
request of such a person or entity.
Sec. 44. NRS 414.044 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.044 1. The written plan for recovery from an emergency
or disaster required by paragraph (a) of subsection 4 of NRS
414.040 must, without limitation:
(a) Establish an organizational structure that facilitates support
by the [Division of Emergency Management of the] Office [of the
Military] of any recovery activities conducted by local governments
and Indian tribes or nations after an emergency or disaster;
(b) Assign roles and responsibilities to state agencies to support
recovery activities;
(c) Identify persons who are employees of federal agencies, state
and local governmental agencies, Indian tribes or nations, private
organizations or other entities identified by the [Division] Office
who will serve as liaisons between those agencies, organizations or
entities and the [Division] Office to coordinate recovery activities;
and
(d) Facilitate the stabilization, rebuilding and revitalization of
communities impacted by an emergency or disaster.
2. Upon request of a state agency, local government or Indian
tribe or nation, the [Division] Office shall provide training regarding
the plan.
3. On or before December 31 of each year, the Chief shall
review and revise the plan as necessary.
Sec. 45. NRS 414.135 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.135 1. There is hereby created in the State General Fund
the Emergency Assistance Account. Beginning with the fiscal year
that begins on July 1, 1999, the State Controller shall, at the end of
each fiscal year, transfer the interest earned during the previous
fiscal year on the money in the Disaster Relief Account created
pursuant to NRS 353.2735 to the Emergency Assistance Account in
an amount not to exceed $500,000.
2. The [Division of Emergency Management of the] Office [of
the Military] shall administer the Emergency Assistance Account.
The [Division] Office may adopt regulations authorized by this
section before, on or after July 1, 1999.
3. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), all
expenditures from the Emergency Assistance Account must be
approved in advance by the [Division.] Office. Except as otherwise
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
provided in subsection 4, all money in the Emergency Assistance
Account must be expended:
(a) To provide supplemental emergency assistance to this State
or to local governments in this State that are severely and adversely
affected by a natural, technological or man-made emergency or
disaster for which available resources of this State or the local
government are inadequate to provide a satisfactory remedy;
(b) To pay any actual expenses incurred by the [Division] Office
for administration during a natural, technological or man-made
emergency or disaster;
(c) To pay any actual expenses incurred by the [Division] Office
for the purpose of emergency management, regardless of whether
the Governor or the Legislature proclaims that an emergency or
disaster exists; and
(d) For any other purpose authorized by the Legislature.
4. Beginning with the fiscal year that begins on July 1, 1999, if
any balance remains in the Emergency Assistance Account at the
end of a fiscal year and the balance has not otherwise been
committed for expenditure, the [Division] Office may, with the
approval of the Interim Finance Committee, allocate all or any
portion of the remaining balance, not to exceed $250,000, to this
State or to a local government to:
(a) Purchase equipment or supplies required for emergency
management;
(b) Provide training to personnel related to emergency
management; and
(c) Carry out the provisions of NRS 388.229 to 388.266,
inclusive.
5. Beginning with the fiscal year that begins on July 1, 1999,
the [Division] Office shall, at the end of each quarter of a fiscal
year, submit to the Interim Finance Committee a report of the
expenditures made from the Emergency Assistance Account for the
previous quarter.
6. The [Division] Office shall adopt such regulations as are
necessary to administer the Emergency Assistance Account.
7. The [Division] Office may adopt regulations to provide for
reimbursement of expenditures made from the Emergency
Assistance Account. If the [Division] Office requires such
reimbursement, the Attorney General shall take such action as is
necessary to recover the amount of any unpaid reimbursement plus
interest at a rate determined pursuant to NRS 17.130, computed
from the date on which the money was removed from the Disaster
Relief Account, upon request by the [Division.] Office.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
Sec. 46. NRS 414.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.165 1. The Nevada Tribal Emergency Coordinating
Council, consisting of not more than 27 members appointed by the
Chief, is hereby created within the [Division of Emergency
Management of the] Office . [of the Military.] The Chief shall
appoint each member from a different federally recognized Indian
tribe or nation, all or part of which is located within the boundaries
of this State. A member of the Council may not represent more than
one federally recognized Indian tribe or nation.
2. The term of office of each member of the Council is 2 years.
3. The Council shall meet at the call of the Chief as frequently
as required to perform its duties, but not less than once each quarter.
4. The [Division of Emergency Management] Office shall
provide the Council with administrative support.
5. The Council shall:
(a) Advise the Chief regarding emergency management on tribal
lands;
(b) Assist in the coordination of mitigation, preparedness,
response and recovery activities related to an emergency on tribal
lands; and
(c) Submit an annual report to the Chief on or before January 31
of each year which must include, without limitation:
(1) A summary of the activities of the Council during the
immediately preceding calendar year; and
(2) Recommendations relating to emergency management on
tribal lands.
6. The Attorney General shall enter into any agreements
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 47. NRS 414.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.200 The Chief, with the advice of the Board, shall appoint
an employee of the [Division of Emergency Management of the]
Office [of the Military] as Coordinator of Search and Rescue.
Sec. 48. NRS 414.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.270 1. A State Disaster Identification Coordination
Committee is hereby established within the [Division of Emergency
Management of the] Office . [of the Military.] The Chief shall
appoint to the State Disaster Identification Coordination Committee:
(a) One or more representatives of a state or local organization
for emergency management;
(b) One or more representatives of the office of a county
coroner;
(c) One or more representatives of the Office of the Attorney
General;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
(d) One or more representatives of the Nevada Hospital
Association or its successor organization;
(e) One or more representatives of a state or local public health
agency whose duties relate to emergency preparedness;
(f) The Chief Medical Officer;
(g) An employee of the Department of Health and Human
Services whose duties relate to ensuring compliance with the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law
104-191, as amended, and any applicable regulations; and
(h) A consumer of healthcare services.
2. The State Disaster Identification Coordination Committee
shall meet at the call of the Chief as frequently as required to
perform its duties, but not less than once each calendar year.
3. The provisions of chapter 241 of NRS do not apply to any
meeting held by the State Disaster Identification Coordination
Committee or a subcommittee thereof.
Sec. 49. NRS 414.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.300 The [Division of Emergency Management of the]
Office [of the Military] shall adopt such regulations as are necessary
to govern the State Disaster Identification Coordination Committee.
Sec. 50. NRS 414.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.310 Broadcasters in this State shall, in cooperation with
the [Division of Emergency Management of the] Office [of the
Military] and the Nevada Broadcasters Association or its successor
organization, develop comprehensive, coordinated plans for
preparing for and responding appropriately to an emergency or
disaster.
Sec. 51. Chapter 414A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Office” means the Office of Emergency Management within
the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 52. NRS 414A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414A.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 414A.015 to
414A.070, inclusive, and section 51 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 53. NRS 414A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414A.100 1. The Nevada Intrastate Mutual Aid System is
hereby established within the [Division.] Office.
2. The Chief of the [Division,] Office, subject to the direction
and control of the [Adjutant General of the Office of the Military,]
Governor, shall administer the System pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter and shall:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
(a) Coordinate the provision of mutual aid during the response
to and recovery from an emergency or disaster;
(b) Maintain records of the requests for and provision of mutual
aid throughout this State;
(c) Identify, maintain an inventory of and coordinate participant
personnel and equipment available for intrastate mutual aid
response;
(d) Provide information and assistance, upon request, to
participants concerning reimbursement for services and other
guidelines and procedures developed by the Intrastate Mutual Aid
Committee pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 414A.110; and
(e) Adopt regulations relating to the administration of the
System.
Sec. 54. NRS 414A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414A.110 1. The Intrastate Mutual Aid Committee is hereby
created. The Committee shall advise the Chief of the [Division]
Office on issues related to emergency management and intrastate
mutual aid in this State.
2. The Committee consists of the following members:
(a) The Chief of the [Division,] Office, or his or her designee,
who serves as the Chair of the Committee and is a nonvoting
member; and
(b) Not more than 19 voting members, each of whom:
(1) Is appointed by the Chief of the [Division;] Office;
(2) Is selected from participating public agencies or tribal
governments;
(3) Must have responsibility for public safety programs or
activities within his or her public agency or tribe or nation; and
(4) After the initial terms, serves a term of 2 years, and may
be reappointed.
3. The Committee shall select a Vice Chair from among the
voting members of the Committee. The Vice Chair serves as Vice
Chair until the end of his or her current term as a voting member,
and may be reselected.
4. The Committee shall develop comprehensive guidelines and
procedures regarding, without limitation:
(a) Requesting intrastate mutual aid;
(b) Responding to a request for intrastate mutual aid;
(c) Recordkeeping during an emergency or disaster for which
intrastate mutual aid has been requested; and
(d) Reimbursement of costs to assisting participants.
5. The Committee shall meet at least annually to evaluate the
effectiveness and efficiency of the System and provide
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
recommendations, if any, to the Chief of the [Division] Office to
improve the System.
Sec. 55. NRS 414A.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414A.120 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each public agency shall participate in the System.
2. Any participant may elect to withdraw from participation in
the System by:
(a) Adopting a resolution declaring that the participant elects not
to participate in the System; and
(b) Providing a copy of the resolution to the [Division] Office
and the Governor.
3. Any federally recognized Indian tribe or nation, all or part of
which is located within the boundaries of this State, may choose to
become a participant in the System by:
(a) Adopting a resolution declaring that the tribe or nation elects
to participate in the System and agreeing to be bound by the
provisions of this chapter; and
(b) Providing a copy of the resolution to the [Division] Office
and the Governor.
4. Each participant shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 of NRS
414A.140, ensure that the participant is able to provide intrastate
mutual aid in response to a request pursuant to NRS 414A.130;
(b) Provide training to each emergency responder on procedures
related to his or her respective role within the System;
(c) Actively monitor events in this State to determine the
possibility of requesting or providing intrastate mutual aid;
(d) Maintain a current list of personnel and any equipment of the
participant available for intrastate mutual aid and submit the list at
least annually to the [Division;] Office;
(e) Conduct joint planning, information sharing and capability
and vulnerability analyses with other participants and conduct joint
training exercises, if practicable; and
(f) Develop, carry out and periodically revise plans of operation,
which must include, without limitation, the methods by which any
resources, facilities and services of the participant must be available
and furnished to other participants.
Sec. 56. NRS 414A.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414A.130 1. Any participant may request intrastate mutual
aid before, during or after a declared or undeclared emergency or
disaster for:
(a) Response, mitigation or recovery activities related to the
emergency or disaster; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
(b) Participation in drills or exercises in preparation for an
emergency or disaster.
2. A participant may make a request for intrastate mutual aid:
(a) Through the [Division;] Office; or
(b) If an urgent response is needed, directly to a participant,
except that any request for a responding state agency must be made
as provided in paragraph (a).
3. Each request for intrastate mutual aid must be documented
and forwarded to the [Division] Office not more than 24 hours after
the request is made.
4. A requesting participant shall:
(a) Adequately describe the resources needed by the requesting
participant;
(b) Provide logistical and technical support, as needed, to any
emergency responders provided by an assisting participant; and
(c) Reimburse the assisting participant for costs incurred, if
applicable, by the assisting participant in a timely manner.
Sec. 57. NRS 414A.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414A.150 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
within 10 business days after the completion of all activities taken in
response to a request for intrastate mutual aid, each assisting
participant shall provide a written notice to the requesting
participant if the assisting participant intends to seek reimbursement
from the requesting participant.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, within 60
calendar days after the completion of the activities specified in
subsection 1, the assisting participant shall provide to the requesting
participant a final request for reimbursement which must include:
(a) A summary of the services provided;
(b) An invoice setting forth all services provided and the total
amount of the reimbursement requested;
(c) Any supporting documentation;
(d) Any additional forms required by the System; and
(e) The name and contact information of a person to contact if
more information is needed.
3. If an assisting participant requires additional time to comply
with the provisions of subsection 1 or 2, the assisting participant
must request an extension in writing from the requesting participant.
A requesting participant may, for good cause shown, grant an
extension for an additional reasonable period.
4. A requesting participant shall reimburse an assisting
participant for all reasonable costs incurred by the assisting
participant in responding to the request for intrastate mutual aid,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
including, without limitation, any costs related to the use of
personnel and equipment and travel. All costs must be documented
in order to be eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this section,
unless otherwise agreed upon by the requesting participant and
assisting participant. Any costs associated with resources which
were used without request are not eligible for reimbursement.
5. Reimbursement may be facilitated through the [Division,]
Office, upon request.
6. If a dispute between participants occurs regarding
reimbursement, the participant disputing the reimbursement shall
provide a written notice to the other participant setting forth the
issues in dispute. If the dispute is not resolved within 90 days after
the notice is provided, either participant may submit the matter to
binding arbitration, which must be conducted pursuant to the rules
for commercial arbitration established by the American Arbitration
Association.
7. The [Division] Office is not liable for any claim relating to
the reimbursement of costs for providing intrastate mutual aid.
Sec. 58. Chapter 415A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Office” means the Office of Emergency Management within
the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 59. NRS 415A.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
415A.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 415A.030 to
415A.180, inclusive, and section 58 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 60. NRS 415A.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
415A.030 “Disaster relief organization” means an entity which
provides emergency or disaster relief services that include health or
veterinary services provided by volunteer health practitioners and
which:
1. Is designated or recognized as a provider of those services
pursuant to a disaster response and recovery plan adopted by an
agency of the Federal Government, the Governor or the [Division;]
Office; or
2. Regularly plans and conducts its activities in coordination
with an agency of the Federal Government or the [Division.] Office.
Sec. 61. NRS 415A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
415A.200 1. While an emergency declaration is in effect, the
[Division] Office may by order limit, restrict or otherwise regulate:
(a) The duration of practice by volunteer health practitioners;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
(b) The geographical areas in which volunteer health
practitioners may practice;
(c) The types of volunteer health practitioners who may practice;
and
(d) Any other matters necessary to coordinate effectively the
provision of health or veterinary services during the emergency.
2. An order issued pursuant to subsection 1 may take effect
immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a
regulation for the purposes of chapter 233B of NRS.
3. A host entity that uses volunteer health practitioners to
provide health or veterinary services in this State shall:
(a) Consult with and coordinate its activities with the [Division]
Office to the extent practicable to provide for the efficient and
effective use of those volunteer health practitioners; and
(b) Comply with any laws other than this chapter relating to the
management of emergency health or veterinary services, including,
without limitation, the provisions of chapters 414 and 414A of NRS.
Sec. 62. NRS 415A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
415A.210 1. To qualify as a registration system for volunteer
health practitioners, a system must:
(a) Accept applications for the registration of volunteer health
practitioners before an emergency and for the provisional
registration of volunteer health practitioners while an emergency
declaration is in effect;
(b) Include information about the licensure and standing of
health practitioners which is accessible by authorized persons;
(c) Be capable of confirming the accuracy of information
concerning whether a health practitioner is licensed and in good
standing before the practitioner provides health services or
veterinary services pursuant to this chapter; and
(d) Meet one of the following conditions:
(1) Be an emergency system for advance registration of
volunteer health care practitioners established by a state and funded
through the United States Department of Health and Human
Services under Section 319I of the Public Health Service Act, 42
U.S.C. § 247d-7b, as amended;
(2) Be a local unit consisting of trained and equipped
emergency response, public health and medical personnel formed
pursuant to Section 2801 of the Public Health Service Act, 42
U.S.C. § 300hh, as amended;
(3) Be operated by a:
(I) Disaster relief organization;
(II) Licensing board;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
(III) National or regional association of licensing boards
or health practitioners;
(IV) Health facility that provides comprehensive inpatient
and outpatient health care services, including, without limitation, a
hospital; or
(V) Governmental entity; or
(4) Be designated by the [Division] Office as a registration
system for the purposes of this chapter.
2. While an emergency declaration is in effect, the [Division,]
Office, a person authorized to act on behalf of the [Division] Office
or a host entity may confirm whether volunteer health practitioners
utilized in this State are registered or provisionally registered with a
registration system that complies with subsection 1. Confirmation is
limited to obtaining identities of the practitioners from the system
and determining whether the system indicates that the practitioners
are licensed and in good standing.
3. Upon the request of a person or entity in this State
authorized to do so pursuant to subsection 2, or a similarly
authorized person or entity in another state, a registration system
located in this State must notify the person or entity of the identities
of volunteer health practitioners and whether the practitioners are
licensed and in good standing.
4. A host entity is not required to use the services of a
volunteer health practitioner even if the practitioner is registered or
provisionally registered with a registration system which indicates
that the practitioner is licensed and in good standing.
5. The [Division] Office shall adopt regulations which provide
for the expedited granting of provisional registration to volunteer
health practitioners while an emergency declaration is in effect.
Sec. 63. NRS 415A.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
415A.240 1. Subject to subsections 2 and 3, a volunteer
health practitioner shall adhere to the scope of practice for a
similarly licensed practitioner established by the licensing
provisions, practice acts or other laws of this State.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, this chapter
does not authorize a volunteer health practitioner to provide services
that are outside the practitioner’s scope of practice, even if a
similarly licensed practitioner in this State would be allowed to
provide the services.
3. The [Division] Office may modify or restrict the health or
veterinary services that volunteer health practitioners may provide
pursuant to this chapter. An order under this subsection may take
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
effect immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a
regulation for the purposes of chapter 233B of NRS.
4. A host entity may restrict the health or veterinary services
that a volunteer health practitioner is allowed to provide pursuant to
this chapter.
5. A volunteer health practitioner does not engage in
unauthorized practice unless the practitioner has reason to know of
any limitation, modification or restriction under this section or that a
similarly licensed practitioner in this State would not be allowed to
provide the services. A volunteer health practitioner has reason to
know of a limitation, modification or restriction or that a similarly
licensed practitioner in this State would not be allowed to provide a
service if:
(a) The practitioner actually knows that the limitation,
modification or restriction exists or that a similarly licensed
practitioner in this State would not be allowed to provide the
service; or
(b) From all the facts and circumstances known to the
practitioner at the relevant time, a reasonable person would
conclude that the limitation, modification or restriction exists or that
a similarly licensed practitioner in this State would not be allowed to
provide the service.
6. In addition to the authority granted by the laws of this State
other than this chapter to regulate the conduct of health
practitioners, a licensing board or other disciplinary authority in this
State:
(a) May impose administrative sanctions upon a health
practitioner licensed in this State for conduct outside of this State in
response to an out-of-state emergency;
(b) May impose administrative sanctions upon a practitioner not
licensed in this State for conduct in this State in response to an in-
state emergency; and
(c) Shall report any administrative sanctions imposed upon a
practitioner licensed in another state to the appropriate licensing
board or other disciplinary authority in any other state in which the
practitioner is known to be licensed.
7. In determining whether to impose administrative sanctions
pursuant to subsection 6, a licensing board or other disciplinary
authority shall consider the circumstances in which the conduct took
place, including, without limitation, any exigent circumstances and
the practitioner’s scope of practice, education, training, experience
and specialized skill.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
Sec. 64. NRS 415A.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
415A.250 1. This chapter does not limit any rights, privileges
or immunities provided to volunteer health practitioners by laws
other than this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, this chapter does not affect requirements for the use of health
practitioners pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance
Compact.
2. The [Division,] Office, pursuant to the Emergency
Management Assistance Compact, may incorporate into the
emergency personnel of this State volunteer health practitioners who
are not officers or employees of this State, a political subdivision of
this State or a municipality or other local government within this
State.
Sec. 65. NRS 415A.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
415A.260 The [Division] Office may adopt regulations to carry
out this chapter. In doing so, the [Division] Office shall consult with
the Governor and consider any pertinent rules or regulations
promulgated by similarly empowered agencies in other states to
promote uniformity in the application of this chapter and make the
emergency response systems in the various states reasonably
compatible.
Sec. 66. NRS 459.796 is hereby amended to read as follows:
459.796 A person is entitled to immunity under subsection 2 of
NRS 459.792 only if:
1. In the case of one furnishing advice or assistance, the person
is qualified by training, education or experience in the handling of
hazardous materials and provides advice or assistance within the
area of his or her qualifications; and
2. The person was requested to provide the equipment, advice
or other assistance by:
(a) The person responsible for the discharge;
(b) The [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military;] Governor;
(c) The Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry;
(d) The Division of Environmental Protection of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources;
(e) The Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of
Public Safety;
(f) The State Fire Marshal Division of the Department of Public
Safety;
(g) The State Emergency Response Commission or a local
emergency planning committee appointed by the Commission;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
(h) A local fire department; or
(i) A local agency for law enforcement.
Sec. 67. NRS 463.790 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.790 1. Each resort hotel shall adopt and maintain an
emergency response plan. Each new or revised plan must be filed
within 3 days after adoption or revision with each local fire
department and local law enforcement agency whose jurisdiction
includes the area in which the resort hotel is located and with the
[Division] Office of Emergency Management [of] within the Office
of the [Military.] Governor.
2. The emergency response plan required by subsection 1 must
include:
(a) A drawing or map of the layout of all areas within the
building or buildings and grounds that constitute a part of the resort
hotel and its support systems and a brief description of the purpose
or use for each area;
(b) A drawing or description of the internal and external access
routes;
(c) The location and inventory of emergency response
equipment and resources;
(d) The location of any unusually hazardous substances;
(e) The name and telephone number of:
(1) The emergency response coordinator for the resort hotel;
and
(2) The person responsible for ensuring that the resort hotel
is in compliance with this section;
(f) The location of one or more site emergency response
command posts;
(g) A description of any special equipment needed to respond to
an emergency at the resort hotel;
(h) An evacuation plan;
(i) A description of any public health or safety hazards present
on the site; and
(j) Any other information requested by a local fire department or
local law enforcement agency whose jurisdiction includes the area
in which the resort hotel is located or by the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management.
3. Each resort hotel shall review its emergency response plan at
least once each year and, as soon as practicable after the review is
completed but not later than November 1 of each year, file with each
local fire department and local law enforcement agency whose
jurisdiction includes the area in which the resort hotel is located and
with the [Division] Office of Emergency Management:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
(a) Any revised emergency response plan resulting from the
review; or
(b) A written certification that the most recent emergency
response plan filed pursuant to this subsection or subsection 1 is the
current emergency response plan for the resort hotel.
4. A plan filed pursuant to the requirements of this section,
including any revisions adopted thereto, is confidential and must be
securely maintained by the department, agency and [Division]
Office of Emergency Management with whom it is filed. An
officer, employee or other person to whom the plan is entrusted by
the department, agency or [Division] Office shall not disclose the
contents of such a plan except:
(a) Upon the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
or
(b) As is reasonably necessary in the case of an emergency
involving public health or safety.
5. If the Board maintains a list of resort hotels, the Board shall
provide a copy of the list to the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management, upon request, for purposes of this section.
6. As used in this section, the term “local law enforcement
agency” means:
(a) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(b) A metropolitan police department; or
(c) A police department of an incorporated city.
Sec. 68. NRS 480.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.425 “Public safety agency” means:
1. A public fire department, fire protection district or other
agency of this State or a political subdivision of this State, the
primary functions of which are to control, extinguish and suppress
fires;
2. A law enforcement agency as defined in NRS 277.035;
3. An emergency medical service;
4. The [Division] Office of Emergency Management [of]
within the Office of the [Military;] Governor; or
5. A local organization for emergency management, as defined
in NRS 414.036.
Sec. 69. NRS 480.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.540 1. The Nevada Threat Analysis Center Advisory
Committee is hereby created within the Investigation Division.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the Advisory
Committee consists of 2 ex officio nonvoting members pursuant to
subsection 2 and not more than 15 voting members, which must
include, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
(a) The Chief of the Investigation Division;
(b) The Chief of the Nevada Highway Patrol of the Department;
(c) The Chief of the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military or another
person designated by the Adjutant General of the Office of the
Military who has experience relating to homeland security;]
Governor;
(d) Three members appointed by the Nevada Sheriffs’ and
Chiefs’ Association or its legal successor who are representatives of
the Association or its legal successor;
(e) One member appointed by the Director of the Department
who is a representative of the Nevada Fire Chiefs’ Association or its
legal successor;
(f) One member appointed by the Director of the Department
who is employed as a police officer by an Indian tribe;
(g) One member appointed by the sheriff of each county in
which a metropolitan police department has been established who is
a representative of the metropolitan police department; and
(h) Any other members appointed by the Director of the
Department based on their experience or knowledge.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
following persons are ex officio nonvoting members of the Advisory
Committee:
(a) The Director of the Nevada Threat Analysis Center created
by NRS 480.530.
(b) The Director of the Department or his or her designee
except, in the case of a tie vote on any question, the Director or his
or her designee shall cast the deciding vote.
3. The Director of the Department or his or her designee shall:
(a) Serve as the Chair of the Committee; and
(b) Select from the members a Vice Chair.
4. Appointed members of the Advisory Committee serve at the
pleasure of the appointing authority.
5. The Advisory Committee shall meet at least twice annually
at the call of the Chair and in conformance with NRS 480.545.
6. Members of the Advisory Committee serve without
compensation and are not entitled to receive a per diem allowance or
travel expenses.
7. The Advisory Committee shall advise the Nevada Threat
Analysis Center created by NRS 480.530 on best practices for the
collection, maintenance, analysis and dissemination of criminal
intelligence information.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
Sec. 70. NRS 480.926 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.926 The Office shall:
1. Establish partnerships with:
(a) Local governments;
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education; and
(c) Private entities, to the extent practicable,
 to encourage the development of strategies to prepare for and
mitigate risks to, and otherwise protect, the security of information
systems that are operated or maintained by a public or private entity
in this State.
2. Establish partnerships to assist and receive assistance from
local governments and appropriate agencies of the Federal
Government regarding the development of strategies to prepare for
and mitigate risks to, and otherwise protect, the security of
information systems.
3. Consult with the [Division] Office of Emergency
Management [of] within the Office of the [Military] Governor and
the Office of the Chief Information Officer within the Office of the
Governor regarding the development of strategies to prepare for and
mitigate risks to, and otherwise protect, the security of information
systems.
4. Coordinate with the Investigation Division of the
Department regarding gathering intelligence on and initiating
investigations of cyber threats and incidents.
Sec. 71. NRS 616A.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616A.140 A member of the Nevada Wing of the Civil Air
Patrol who participates:
1. In a mission; or
2. In training,
 which has been authorized by the [Division] Office of
Emergency Management [of] within the Office of the [Military]
Governor shall be deemed for the purposes of chapters 616A to
616D, inclusive, of NRS to be an employee of the [Division] Office
of Emergency Management at the wage of $600 per month and, in
the event of injury during such a mission or training, is entitled to
the benefits of those chapters.
Sec. 72. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 55 –
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 73. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
Sec. 74. NRS 239C.045, 353.2712, 412.069, 414A.025 and
415A.040 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 75. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)